California statutes. Probate Code
In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it, consistent with the need to protect individual civil rights and in accordance with due process.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

2022.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (Title 15 (commencing with Section 7001) of the United States Code), but does not modify, limit, or supersede subdivision (c) of Section 101 of that act, which is codified as subdivision (c) of Section 7001 of Title 15 of the United States Code, or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in subdivision (b) of Section 103 of that act, which is codified as subdivision (b) of Section 7003 of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

2023.

(a) On or before January 1, 2016, the Judicial Council shall develop court rules and forms as necessary for the implementation of this chapter.

(b) The materials developed pursuant to this section shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) A cover sheet for registration of a conservatorship under Section 2011, 2012, or 2013. The cover sheet shall explain that a proceeding may not be registered under Section 2011, 2012, or 2013 if the proceeding relates to a minor. The cover sheet shall further explain that a proceeding in which a person is subjected to involuntary mental health care may not be registered under
 Section 2011, 2012, or 2013. The cover sheet shall require the conservator to initial each of these explanations. The cover sheet shall also prominently state that when a conservator acts pursuant to registration, the conservator is subject to the law of this state governing the action, including, but not limited to, all applicable procedures, and is not authorized to take any action prohibited by the law of this state. Except as provided in subdivision (c), the cover sheet shall also prominently state that the registration is effective only while the conservatee resides in another jurisdiction and does not authorize the conservator to take any action while the conservatee is residing in this state. Directly beneath these statements, the cover sheet shall include a signature box in which the conservator attests to these matters.

(2) The form required by paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 2017. If the Judicial Council deems it
 advisable, this form may be included in the civil cover sheet developed under paragraph (1).

(3) A form for providing notice of intent to register a proceeding under Section 2011, 2012, or 2013.

(4) A form for a conservator to acknowledge receipt of the written information required by Section 2015.

(c) The materials prepared pursuant to this section shall be consistent with Section 2019.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2015, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

2024.

(a) This chapter applies to conservatorship proceedings begun on or after January 1, 2016.

(b) Articles 1, 3, and 4 and Sections 2021 and 2022 apply to proceedings begun before January 1, 2016, regardless of whether a conservatorship order has been issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Federally Recognized Indian Tribe [2031. - 2033.]

2031.

For the purposes of this chapter:

(a) “California tribe” means an Indian tribe with jurisdiction that has tribal land located in California.

(b) “Indian tribe with jurisdiction” means a federally recognized Indian tribe that has a court system that exercises jurisdiction over proceedings that are substantially equivalent to conservatorship proceedings.

(c) “Tribal land” means land that is, with respect to a specific Indian tribe and the members of that tribe, “Indian country” as defined in Section 1151 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

2032.

Article 2 (commencing with Section 1991) does not apply to a proposed conservatee who is a member of an Indian tribe with jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

2033.

(a) If a petition for the appointment of a conservator has been filed in a court of this state and a conservator has not yet been appointed, any person entitled to notice of a hearing on the petition may move to dismiss the petition on the grounds that the proposed conservatee is a member of an Indian tribe with jurisdiction. The petition shall state the name of the Indian tribe.

(b) If, after communicating with the named tribe, the court of this state finds that the proposed conservatee is a member of an Indian tribe with jurisdiction, it may grant the motion to dismiss if it finds that there is good cause to do so. If the motion is granted, the court may impose any condition the court considers just
 and proper, including the condition that a petition for the appointment of a conservator be filed promptly in the tribal court.

(c) In determining whether there is good cause to grant the motion, the court may consider all relevant factors, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Any expressed preference of the proposed conservatee.

(2) Whether abuse, neglect, or exploitation of the proposed conservatee has occurred or is likely to occur and which state could best protect the proposed conservatee from the abuse, neglect, or exploitation.

(3) The length of time the proposed conservatee was physically present in or was a legal resident of this or another state.

(4) The location of
 the proposed conservatee’s family, friends, and other persons required to be notified of the conservatorship proceeding.

(5) The distance of the proposed conservatee from the court in each state.

(6) The financial circumstances of the estate of the proposed conservatee.

(7) The nature and location of the evidence.

(8) The ability of the court in each state to decide the issue expeditiously and the procedures necessary to present evidence.

(9) The familiarity of the court of each state with the facts and issues in the proceeding.

(10) If an appointment were made, the court’s ability to monitor the conduct of the
 conservator.

(11) The timing of the motion, taking into account the parties’ and court’s expenditure of time and resources.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the court shall not grant a motion to dismiss pursuant to this section if the tribal court expressly declines to exercise its jurisdiction with regard to the proposed conservatee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. PROVISIONS COMMON TO GUARDIANSHIP AND CONSERVATORSHIP [2100. - 2893.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [2100. - 2113.]

2100.

Guardianships and conservatorships are governed by Division 3 (commencing with Section 1000), except to the extent otherwise expressly provided by statute, and by this division. If no specific provision of this division is applicable, the provisions applicable to administration of estates of decedents govern so far as they are applicable to like situations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2101.

The relationship of guardian and ward and of conservator and conservatee is a fiduciary relationship that is governed by the law of trusts, except as provided in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 293, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2102.

A guardian or conservator is subject to the regulation and control of the court in the performance of the duties of the office.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2103.

(a) When a judgment or order made pursuant to this division becomes final, it releases the guardian or conservator and the sureties from all claims of the ward or conservatee and of any persons affected thereby based upon any act or omission directly authorized, approved, or confirmed in the judgment or order. For the purposes of this section, “order” includes an order settling an account of the guardian or conservator, whether an intermediate or final account.

(b) This section does not apply where the judgment or order is obtained by fraud or conspiracy or by misrepresentation contained in the petition or account or in the judgment or order as to any material fact. For the purposes of this subdivision, misrepresentation includes, but is not limited to, the omission of a material fact.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2104.

(a) A nonprofit charitable corporation may be appointed as a guardian or conservator of the person or estate, or both, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The corporation is incorporated in this state.

(2) The articles of incorporation specifically authorize the corporation to accept appointments as guardian or conservator, as the case may be.

(3) The corporation has been providing, at the time of appointment, care, counseling, or financial assistance to the proposed ward or conservatee under the supervision of a registered social worker certified by the Board of Behavioral Science Examiners of this state.

(b) The petition for appointment of a nonprofit charitable corporation described in this section as a guardian or conservator shall include in the caption the name of a responsible corporate officer who shall act for the corporation for the purposes of this division. If, for any reason, the officer so named ceases to act as the responsible corporate officer for the purposes of this division, the corporation shall file with the court a notice containing (1) the name of the successor responsible corporate officer and (2) the date the successor becomes the responsible corporate officer.

(c) If a nonprofit charitable corporation described in this section is appointed as a guardian or conservator:

(1) The corporation’s compensation as guardian or conservator shall be allowed only for services actually rendered.

(2) Any fee allowed for an attorney for the corporation shall be for services actually rendered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 351, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2104.1.

A nonprofit charitable corporation not incorporated in this state may be appointed as the guardian of a minor if all of the following requirements are met:

(a) The articles of incorporation specifically authorize the nonprofit charitable corporation to accept appointments as a guardian.

(b) The nonprofit charitable corporation is contracted by the federal Department of Health and Human Services, Office of Refugee Resettlement, or its successor federal government entity, to provide care and custody of the minor.

(c) The petition for guardianship is filed in connection with a petition
 to make the necessary findings regarding special immigrant juvenile status pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 155 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) The nonprofit charitable corporation is licensed by this state to provide care for minors.

(e) The nonprofit charitable corporation complies with all of the requirements of Section 2104, except for paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 2104.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 528, Sec. 2.   (AB 829)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2105.

(a) The court, in its discretion, may appoint for a ward or conservatee:

(1) Two or more joint guardians or conservators of the person.

(2) Two or more joint guardians or conservators of the estate.

(3) Two or more joint guardians or conservators of the person and estate.

(b) When joint guardians or conservators are appointed, each shall qualify in the same manner as a sole guardian or conservator.

(c) Subject to subdivisions (d) and (e):

(1) Where
 there are two guardians or conservators, both must concur to exercise a power.

(2) Where there are more than two guardians or conservators, a majority must concur to exercise a power.

(d) If one of the joint guardians or conservators dies or is removed or resigns, the powers and duties continue in the remaining joint guardians or conservators until further appointment is made by the court.

(e) Where joint guardians or conservators have been appointed and one or more are (1) absent from the state and unable to act, (2) otherwise unable to act, or (3) legally disqualified from serving, the court may, by order made with or without notice, authorize the remaining joint guardians or conservators to act as to all matters embraced within its order.

(f) If a
 custodial parent has been diagnosed as having a terminal condition, as evidenced by a declaration executed by a licensed physician, the court, in its discretion, may appoint the custodial parent and a person nominated by the custodial parent as joint guardians of the person of the minor. However, this appointment shall not be made over the objection of a noncustodial parent without a finding that the noncustodial parent’s custody would be detrimental to the minor, as provided in Section 3041 of the Family Code. It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting the amendments to this subdivision adopted during the 1995–96 Regular Session for a parent with a terminal condition to be able to make arrangements for the joint care, custody, and control of their minor children so as to minimize the emotional stress of, and disruption for, the minor children whenever the parent is incapacitated or upon the parent’s death, and to avoid the need to provide a temporary guardian or place the minor children in foster care,
 pending appointment of a guardian, as might otherwise be required.

“Terminal condition,” for purposes of this subdivision, means an incurable and irreversible condition that, without the administration of life-sustaining treatment, will, within reasonable medical judgment, result in death.

(g) (1) If a custodial parent is temporarily unavailable due to circumstances, including, but not limited to, a serious medical condition or disability, military service, incarceration, or an immigration-related administrative action, specified in the parent’s nomination of a guardian, the court, in its discretion, may appoint the custodial parent and the person nominated by the custodial parent as joint guardians of the person of the minor. A nomination made pursuant to this subdivision shall not be made over the objection of a noncustodial parent without a finding that the noncustodial
 parent’s custody would be detrimental to the minor, as provided in Section 3041 of the Family Code.

(2) If a parent appointed as a joint guardian pursuant to this subdivision files a petition to terminate the joint guardianship because the conditions specified in the nomination, or otherwise stated in the petition for guardianship, no longer impairs the parent’s availability to provide care for their child, there shall be a presumption that termination would be in the child’s best interest.

(3) All court records, petitions, orders, and documents related to the appointment of joint guardians pursuant to this subdivision shall be confidential, and shall be made available only to the persons who have been served in the proceeding and their attorneys, if applicable. The clerk of the court shall make provisions to limit access to these documents and any other information that
 personally identifies the minor, custodial parent, the appointed guardian, or family members who are a party to or identified in the proceeding.

(4) Consistent with Section 7284.6 of the Government Code, information contained in these records shall not be disclosed to law enforcement officers or agencies or any entity engaged in immigration enforcement without a court order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 664, Sec. 8.   (AB 495)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2105.5.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), where there is more than one guardian or conservator of the estate, one guardian or conservator is not liable for a breach of fiduciary duty committed by another guardian or conservator.

(b) Where there is more than one guardian or conservator of the estate, one guardian or conservator is liable for a breach of fiduciary duty committed by another guardian or conservator of the same estate under any of the following circumstances:

(1) Where the guardian or conservator participates in a breach of fiduciary duty committed by the other guardian or conservator.

(2) Where the guardian or conservator improperly delegates the administration of the estate to the other guardian or conservator.

(3) Where the guardian or conservator approves, knowingly acquiesces in, or conceals a breach of fiduciary duty committed by the other guardian or conservator.

(4) Where the guardian or conservator negligently enables the other guardian or conservator to commit a breach of fiduciary duty.

(5) Where the guardian or conservator knows or has information from which the guardian or conservator reasonably should have known of the breach of fiduciary duty by the other guardian or conservator and fails to take reasonable steps to compel the other guardian or conservator to redress the breach.

(c) The liability of a guardian or conservator for a breach of fiduciary duty committed by another guardian or conservator that occurred before July 1, 1988, is governed by prior law and not by this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2106.

(a) The court, in its discretion, may appoint one guardian or conservator for several wards or conservatees.

(b) The appointment of one guardian or conservator for several wards or conservatees may be requested in the initial petition filed in the proceeding or may be requested subsequently upon a petition filed in the same proceeding and noticed and heard with respect to the newly proposed ward or conservatee in the same manner as an initial petition for appointment of a guardian or conservator.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2107.

(a) Unless limited by court order, when a court of this state appoints a guardian or conservator of the person of a nonresident, the appointee has the same powers and duties as a guardian or conservator of the person of a resident while the nonresident is in this state.

(b) When a court of this state appoints a guardian or conservator of the estate of a nonresident, the appointee has, with respect to the property of the nonresident within this state, the same powers and duties as a guardian or conservator of the estate of a resident. The responsibility of such a guardian or conservator with regard to inventory, accounting, and disposal of the estate is confined to the property that
 comes into the hands of the guardian or conservator in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 21.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

2108.

(a) Except to the extent the court for good cause determines otherwise, if a guardian of the person is nominated as provided in Article 1 (commencing with Section 1500) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 and is appointed by the court, the guardian shall be granted in the order of appointment, to the extent provided in the nomination, the same authority with respect to the person of the ward as a parent having legal custody of a child and may exercise such authority without notice, hearing, or court authorization, instructions, approval, or confirmation in the same manner as if such authority were exercised by a parent having legal custody of a child.

(b) Except to the extent the court for good cause determines otherwise and subject to Sections 2593, 2594, and 2595, if a guardian of the estate is nominated under Section 1500 or a guardian for property is nominated under Section 1501 and the guardian is appointed by the court, the guardian shall be granted in the order of appointment, to the extent provided in the nomination, the right to exercise any one or more of the powers listed in Section 2591 without notice, hearing, or court authorization, instructions, approval, or confirmation in the same manner as if such authority were granted by order of the court under Section 2590. In the case of a guardian nominated under Section 1501, such additional authority shall be limited to the property covered by the nomination.

(c) The terms of any order made under this section shall be included in the letters.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2109.

(a) Subject to Section 2108, a guardian appointed under subdivision (d) of Section 1514 for particular property upon a nomination made under Section 1501 has, with respect to that property, the same powers and duties as a guardian of the estate. The responsibility of such a guardian with regard to inventory, accounting, and disposal of the estate is confined to the property covered by the nomination.

(b) When a guardian is appointed under subdivision (d) of Section 1514 for particular property upon a nomination made under Section 1501 and there is a guardian of the estate appointed under any other provision of Part 2 (commencing with Section 1500):

(1) The guardian appointed for the property covered by the nomination manages and controls that property and the guardian of the estate manages and controls the balance of the guardianship estate.

(2) Either guardian may petition under Section 2403 to the court in which the guardianship of the estate proceeding is pending for instructions concerning how the duties that are imposed by law upon the guardian of the estate are to be allocated between the two guardians.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2110.

Unless otherwise provided in the instrument or in this division, a guardian or conservator is not personally liable on an instrument, including but not limited to a note, mortgage, deed of trust, or other contract, properly entered into in the guardian’s or conservator’s fiduciary capacity in the course of the guardianship or conservatorship unless the guardian or conservator fails to reveal the guardian’s or conservator’s representative capacity or identify the guardianship or conservatorship estate in the instrument.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2111.

(a) As used in this section, “transaction” means any of the following:

(1) A conveyance or lease of real property of the guardianship or conservatorship estate.

(2) The creation of a mortgage or deed of trust on real property of the guardianship or conservatorship estate.

(3) A transfer of personal property of the guardianship or conservatorship estate.

(4) The creation of a security interest or other lien in personal property of the guardianship or conservatorship estate.

(b) Whenever the court authorizes or directs a transaction, the transaction shall be carried out by the guardian or conservator of the estate in accordance with the terms of the order.

(c) A conveyance, lease, or mortgage of, or deed of trust on, real property executed by a guardian or conservator shall set forth therein that it is made by authority of the order authorizing or directing the transaction and shall give the date of the order. A certified copy of the order shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder in each county in which any portion of the real property is located.

(d) A transaction carried out by a guardian or conservator in accordance with an order authorizing or directing the transaction has the same effect as if the ward or conservatee had carried out the transaction while having legal capacity to do so.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2111.5.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), every court official or employee who has duties or responsibilities related to the appointment of a guardian or conservator, or the processing of any document related to a guardian or conservator, and every person who is related by blood or marriage to a court official or employee who has these duties, is prohibited from purchasing, leasing, or renting any real or personal property from the estate of the ward or conservatee whom the guardian or conservator represents. For purposes of this subdivision, a “person related by blood or marriage” means any of the following:

(1) A person’s spouse or domestic partner.

(2) Relatives within the second degree of lineal or collateral consanguinity of a person or a person’s spouse.

(b) A person described in subdivision (a) is not prohibited from purchasing real or personal property from the estate of the ward or conservatee whom the guardian or conservator represents where the purchase is made under terms and conditions of a public sale of the property.

(c) A violation of this section shall result in the rescission of the purchase, lease, or rental of the property. Any losses incurred by the estate of the ward or conservatee because the property was sold or leased at less than fair market value shall be deemed as charges against the guardian or conservator under the provisions of Sections 2401.3 and 2401.5. The court shall assess a civil penalty equal to three times the charges against the guardian, conservator, or other person in violation of this section, and may assess punitive damages as it deems proper. If the estate does not incur losses as a result of the violation, the court shall order the guardian, conservator, or other person in violation of this section to pay a fine of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation. The fines and penalties provided in this section are in addition to any other rights and remedies provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 893, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2112.

(a) (1) In addition to other remedies available under statutory or common law, if the court finds that a conservator who is a professional fiduciary licensed by the Professional Fiduciaries Bureau has abused a conservatee, the conservator shall be liable for a civil penalty of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each separate act of abuse, payable to the estate of the conservatee.

(2) In addition to other remedies available under statutory or common law, if the court finds that a conservator who is not a professional fiduciary licensed by the Professional Fiduciaries Bureau has abused a conservatee, the conservator shall be liable
 for a civil penalty of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each separate act of abuse, payable to the estate of the conservatee.

(b) If the court finds that a professional fiduciary has abused a
 conservatee, or if the court imposes a penalty on the professional fiduciary, including, but not limited to, surcharging, punishing for contempt, suspending, or removing the professional fiduciary as a conservator for cause, the court shall report that finding or penalty to the Professional Fiduciaries Bureau. If the court reports an action taken under this section, the court shall provide the bureau, at no charge, with access to the information, including confidential information, regarding its investigation of the professional fiduciary contained in court records. The bureau shall maintain the
 confidentiality of the information, as required by paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 6580 of the Business and Professions Code or any other applicable state or federal law.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Abused” means that the conservator engaged in an act described in Section 15610.07 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) “Professional fiduciary” has the same meaning as defined in Section 6501 of the Business and Professions Code.

(d) A superior court shall not be required to perform any duties imposed pursuant to this section until the Legislature makes an appropriation identified for this
 purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 417, Sec. 17.   (AB 1194)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2113.

A conservator shall accommodate the desires of the conservatee, except to the extent that doing so would violate the conservator’s fiduciary duties to the conservatee or impose an unreasonable expense on the conservatorship estate. To the greatest extent possible, the conservator shall support the conservatee to maximize their autonomy, support the conservatee in making decisions, and, on a regular basis, inform the conservatee of decisions made on their behalf. In determining the desires of the conservatee, the conservator shall consider stated or previously expressed preferences, including preferences expressed by speech, sign language, alternative or augmentative communication, actions, facial expressions, and other spoken and nonspoken methods of communication.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 894, Sec. 15.   (AB 1663)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Jurisdiction and Venue [2200. - 2217.]



  ARTICLE 1. Jurisdiction and Venue [2200. - 2205.]

2200.

(a) The superior court has jurisdiction of guardianship and conservatorship proceedings.

(b) Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1980) of Part 3 governs which state has jurisdiction of a conservatorship proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 22.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

2201.

The proper county for the commencement of a guardianship or conservatorship proceeding for a resident of this state is either of the following:

(a) The county in which the proposed ward or proposed conservatee resides.

(b) Such other county as may be in the best interests of the proposed ward or proposed conservatee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2202.

(a) The proper county for the commencement of a proceeding for the guardianship or conservatorship of the person of a nonresident of this state is either of the following:

(1) The county in which the proposed ward or conservatee is temporarily living.

(2) Such other county as may be in the best interests of the proposed ward or proposed conservatee.

(b) The proper county for the commencement of a proceeding for the guardianship or conservatorship of the estate for a nonresident of this state is any of the following:

(1) The county in which the proposed ward or proposed conservatee is temporarily living.

(2) Any county in which the proposed ward or proposed conservatee has property.

(3) Such other county as may be in the best interests of the proposed ward or proposed conservatee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2203.

(a) If proceedings for the guardianship or conservatorship of the estate are commenced in more than one county, the guardianship or conservatorship of the estate first granted, including a temporary guardianship or conservatorship of the estate, governs and extends to all the property of the ward or conservatee within this state and the other proceeding shall be dismissed.

(b) If proceedings for the guardianship or conservatorship of the person are commenced in more than one county, the guardianship or conservatorship of the person first granted, including a temporary guardianship or conservatorship of the person, governs and the other proceeding shall be dismissed.

(c) If a proceeding for the guardianship or conservatorship of the person is commenced in one county and a proceeding for the guardianship or conservatorship of the estate is commenced in a different county, the court first granting the guardianship or conservatorship, whether of the person or of the estate, may find that it is in the best interests of the ward or conservatee that the guardianship or conservatorship of both the person and the estate be maintained in that county or in such other county as the court shall determine. Thereupon, the guardianship or conservatorship proceeding in the court of the county found by the court to be in the best interests of the ward or conservatee shall govern and shall extend to all property of the ward or conservatee within this state, and the other proceeding shall be dismissed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2204.

(a) If a proceeding for the guardianship of the person of the minor is filed in one county and a custody or visitation proceeding has already been filed in one or more other counties, the following shall apply:

(1) If the guardianship proceeding is filed in a county where the proposed ward and the proposed guardian have resided for six or more consecutive months immediately prior to the commencement of the proceeding, or, in the case of a minor less than six months of age, since the minor’s birth, the court in that county is the proper court to hear and determine the guardianship proceeding, unless that court determines that the best interests of the minor require that the proceeding be
 transferred to one of the other courts. A period of temporary absence no longer than 30 days from the county of the minor or the proposed guardian shall not be considered an interruption of the six-month period.

(2) If the guardianship proceeding is filed in a county where the proposed ward and the proposed guardian have resided for less than six consecutive months immediately prior to the commencement of the proceeding, or, in the case of a minor less than six months of age, a period less than the minor’s life, the court shall transfer the case to one of the other courts, unless the court determines that the best interests of the minor require that the guardianship proceeding be maintained in the court where it was filed.

(3) If a petitioner or respondent in a custody or
 visitation proceeding who is an authorized petitioner under Section 2212 petitions the court where the guardianship proceeding is filed for transfer of the guardianship proceeding to the court where the custody or visitation proceeding is on file at any time before the appointment of a guardian, including a temporary guardian, the provisions of this subdivision shall apply to the court’s determination of the petition for transfer. Except as provided in this paragraph, the petition for transfer shall be determined as provided in Sections 2212 to 2217, inclusive.

(b) The following shall apply concerning communications between the courts:

(1) The court where the guardianship proceeding is commenced shall communicate concerning the proceedings with each court where a custody
 or visitation proceeding is on file prior to making a determination authorized in subdivision (a), including a determination of a petition to transfer.

(2) If a petitioner or respondent, who is authorized to petition to transfer under Section 2212, petitions the court where the guardianship proceeding is filed for transfer of the guardianship after the appointment of a guardian, including a temporary guardian, the court in the guardianship proceeding may communicate with each court where a custody or visitation proceeding is on file before determining the petition for transfer.

(3) If the court in the guardianship proceeding appoints a guardian of the person of the minor, including a temporary guardian, the court shall transmit a copy of the order appointing a guardian to each
 court where a custody or visitation proceeding is on file, and each of those courts shall file the order in the case file for its custody or visitation proceeding.

(4) The provisions of subdivisions (b) to (e), inclusive, of Section 3410 of the Family Code shall apply to communications between courts under this subdivision.

(5) The Judicial Council shall, on or before January 1, 2013, adopt rules of court to implement the provisions of this subdivision.

(c) For purposes of this section, “custody or visitation proceeding” means a proceeding described in Section 3021 of the Family Code that relates to the rights to custody or visitation of the minor under Part 2 (commencing with Section 3020) of Division 8 of the Family
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 207, Sec. 1.   (AB 2683)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2205.

(a) Except as provided in Section 304 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and subject to the provisions specified in subdivision (b), upon the filing of an order appointing a guardian of the person of a minor in a guardianship proceeding, including an order appointing a temporary guardian of the person of the minor, the court in the guardianship proceeding shall have exclusive jurisdiction to determine all issues of custody or visitation of the minor until the guardianship proceeding is terminated.

(b) This section is subject to the provisions of Sections 1510 of this code, and 8714, 8714.5, and 8802 of the Family Code, relating to consolidation of guardianship and adoption proceedings and the court where the consolidated case is to be heard and decided.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 102, Sec. 3.   (AB 458)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Change of Venue [2210. - 2217.]

2210.

As used in this article:

(a) “Guardian or conservator” includes a proposed guardian or proposed conservator.

(b) “Ward or conservatee” includes a proposed ward or proposed conservatee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2211.

The court in which a guardianship or conservatorship proceeding is pending may, upon petition therefor, transfer the proceeding to another county within this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2212.

The petition for transfer may be filed only by one or more of the following:

(a) The guardian or conservator.

(b) The ward or conservatee.

(c) The spouse of the ward or the spouse or domestic partner of the conservatee.

(d) A relative or friend of the ward or conservatee.

(e) Any other interested person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 893, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2213.

The petition for transfer shall set forth all of the following:

(a) The county to which the proceeding is to be transferred.

(b) The name and address of the ward or conservatee.
